Florida, session 2026, SB546.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 31 32 Section 1.âPresent subsections (7) through (19) of section 33 253.0341, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (8) 34 through (20), respectively, a new subsection (7) is added to 35 that section, and present subsection (11) of that section is 36 amended, to read: 37 253.0341âSurplus of state-owned lands.â 38 (7)âAt least 30 days before any meeting of the Acquisition 39 and Restoration Council or board of trustees to review the 40 proposed sale of conservation lands, the Division of State Lands 41 shall publish the following information on its website: 42 (a)âThe parcels of state-owned land for sale; and 43 (b)âA statement from the division explaining why the lands 44 are no longer needed for conservation purposes. 45 (12)(11)âRequests to surplus lands may be made by any 46 public or private entity or person and shall be determined by 47 the board of trustees. All requests to surplus conservation 48 lands shall be submitted to the lead managing agency for review 49 and recommendation to the Acquisition and Restoration Council, 50 and all requests to surplus nonconservation lands shall be 51 submitted to the Division of State Lands for review and 52 recommendation to the board of trustees. The lead managing 53 agencies shall review such requests and make recommendations to 54 the council within 90 days after receipt of the requests. Any 55 requests to surplus conservation lands that are not acted upon 56 within the 90-day period shall be immediately scheduled for 57 hearing at the next regularly scheduled meeting of the council. 58 Requests to surplus lands shall be considered by the board of 59 trustees within 60 days after receipt of the requests from the 60 council or division. Requests to surplus lands pursuant to this 61 subsection are not required to be offered to state agencies as 62 provided in subsection (8) (7). 63 Section 2.âPresent paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) of 64 subsection (4) of section 253.42, Florida Statutes, are 65 redesignated as paragraphs (d), (e), and (f), respectively, new 66 paragraphs (b) and (c) are added to that subsection, and 67 paragraph (a) of that subsection is amended, to read: 68 253.42âBoard of trustees may exchange lands.âThis section 69 applies to all lands owned by, vested in, or titled in the name 70 of the board of trustees whether the lands were acquired by the 71 state as a purchase, or through gift, donation, or any other 72 conveyance for which no consideration was paid. 73 (4)(a)âA person who owns land contiguous to state-owned 74 land titled to the board of trustees may submit a request to the 75 Division of State Lands to exchange all or a portion of the 76 privately owned land for all or a portion of the state-owned 77 land, whereby the state retains a permanent conservation 78 easement over all or a portion of the exchanged state-owned land 79 and a permanent conservation easement over all or a portion of 80 the exchanged privately owned land. State-owned land exchanged 81 pursuant to this subsection must shall be contiguous to the 82 privately owned land upon which the state retains a permanent 83 conservation easement. Each parcel proposed for exchange 84 pursuant to this subsection must have at least one appraisal 85 that follows the appraisal criteria, techniques, and methods 86 adopted by the board of trustees pursuant to s. 253.025(8)(e) If 87 the division elects to proceed with a request, the division must 88 submit the request to the Acquisition and Restoration Council 89 for review and the council must provide recommendations to the 90 division. If the division elects to forward a request to the 91 board of trustees, the division must provide its recommendations 92 and the recommendations of the council to the board. This 93 subsection does not apply to state-owned sovereign submerged 94 land. 95 (b)âAt least 30 days before any meeting of the Acquisition 96 and Restoration Council or board of trustees to review the 97 proposed land exchange of conservation lands, the Division of 98 State Lands shall publish the following information on its 99 website: 100 1.âThe parcels of state-owned lands proposed for exchange; 101 2.âThe privately owned parcels of land proposed for 102 exchange; 103 3.âThe portions of the lands identified in subparagraphs 1. 104 and 2. which will be preserved in a permanent conservation 105 easement; 106 4.âA statement from the division explaining how the 107 exchange will result in a conservation benefit to the state; and 108 5.âAny recommendations from the division and the council 109 related to the request. 110 (c)âIf the Division of State Lands elects to proceed with a 111 request, the division must submit the request to the council for 112 review, and the council must provide recommendations to the 113 division. If the division elects to forward a request to the 114 board of trustees, the division must provide its recommendations 115 and the recommendations of the council to the board. 116 Section 3.âParagraph (a) of subsection (6) of section 117 373.089, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 118 373.089âSale or exchange of lands, or interests or rights 119 in lands.âThe governing board of the district may sell lands, or 120 interests or rights in lands, to which the district has acquired 121 title or to which it may hereafter acquire title in the 122 following manner: 123 (6)âAny lands the title to which is vested in the governing 124 board of a water management district may be surplused pursuant 125 to the procedures set forth in this section and s. 373.056 and 126 the following: 127 (a)âFor those lands designated as acquired for conservation 128 purposes, the governing board shall make a determination that 129 the lands are no longer needed for conservation purposes and may 130 dispose of them by a two-thirds vote. At least 30 days before 131 the governing board meets to review the proposed sale or 132 exchange of such lands, the governing board shall publish the 133 following information on its website, as applicable: 134 1.âThe parcels of district-owned lands for sale or proposed 135 for exchange; 136 2.âThe parcels of privately owned lands proposed for 137 exchange; 138 3.âThe portions of the lands identified in subparagraphs 1. 139 and 2. which will be preserved in a permanent conservation 140 easement; and 141 4.âA statement from the district explaining why the lands 142 are no longer needed for conservation purposes. 143 144 If the Board of Trustees of the Internal Improvement Trust Fund 145 declines to accept title to the lands offered under this 146 section, the land may be disposed of by the district under the 147 provisions of this section. 148 Section 4.âSubsection (1) of section 215.196, Florida 149 Statutes, is amended to read: 150 215.196âArchitects Incidental Trust Fund; creation; 151 assessment.â 152 (1)âThere is created the Architects Incidental Trust Fund 153 for the purpose of: 154 (a)âCollecting all funds received through the sale of 155 surplus state-owned office buildings, as defined in s. 255.248, 156 and the nonconservation lands associated with such buildings; 157 (b)âDiverting funds referenced in s. 253.0341(15)(b) s. 158 253.0341(14)(b); and 159 (c)âProviding sufficient funds for the operation of the 160 facilities development activities of the Department of 161 Management Services. 162 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.